Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.910

Applicability.

This chapter applies to:

(1) A proceeding for appointment of a guardian or conservator or for a protective arrangement instead of guardianship or conservatorship commenced after January 1, 2022; and

(2) A guardianship, conservatorship, or protective arrangement instead of a guardianship or conservatorship in existence on January 1, 2022, unless the court finds application of a particular provision of chapter 437, Laws of 2019 would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the proceeding or prejudice the rights of a party, in which case the particular provision of chapter 437, Laws of 2019 does not apply and the superseded law applies.

[ 2021 c 65 s 107; 2019 c 437 s 804.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 65 ss 106 and 107: See note following RCW 11.130.670.

Explanatory statement—2021 c 65: See note following RCW 53.54.030.